Montana, session 2025, HB700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 19-2-409, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-2-409. Plans to be funded on actuarially sound basis -- definition. (1) As required by Article
VIII, section 15, of the Montana constitution, each system must be funded on an actuarially sound basis. For
the purposes of this section, "actuarially sound basis" means that contributions to each retirement plan must be
sufficient to pay the full actuarial cost of the plan.
(2) (a) For a defined benefit plan, the full actuarial cost includes both the normal cost of providing
benefits as they accrue in the future and the cost of amortizing unfunded liabilities over a scheduled period of
no more than 30 years 25 years, except that with respect to the judges' retirement system, the highway patrol
officers' retirement system, the sheriffs' retirement system, and the game wardens' and peace officers'
retirement system, the unfunded liabilities must be paid over the periods provided for in 19-5-404, 19-6-404, 19-
7-404, and 19-8-504, respectively.
(b) For the defined contribution plan, the full actuarial cost is the contribution defined by law that is
payable to an account on behalf of the member."

Section 2. Section 19-3-109, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-3-109. Public employees' retirement system benefit policy statement. It is the policy of the
state that additional benefits may not be added to the public employees' retirement system unless the system
amortizes in 30 years 25 years or less and the additional benefit is projected to be fully funded in perpetuity."
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 700

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 700.1

Section 3. Section 19-5-106, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-5-106. Judges' retirement system benefit policy statement. It is the policy of the state that
additional benefits may not be added to the judges' retirement system unless the system amortizes in 30 years
25 years or less and the additional benefit is projected to be fully funded in perpetuity."

Section 4. Section 19-6-107, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-6-107. Highway patrol officers' retirement system benefit policy statement. It is the policy of
the state that additional benefits may not be added to the highway patrol officers' retirement system unless the
system amortizes in 30 years 25 years or less and the additional benefit is projected to be fully funded in
perpetuity."

Section 5. Section 19-7-106, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-7-106. Sheriffs' retirement system benefit policy statement. It is the policy of the state that
additional benefits may not be added to the sheriffs' retirement system unless the system amortizes in 30 years
25 years or less and the additional benefit is projected to be fully funded in perpetuity."

Section 6. Section 19-8-106, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-8-106. Game wardens' and peace officers' retirement system benefit policy statement. It is
the policy of the state that additional benefits may not be added to the game wardens' and peace officers'
retirement system unless the system amortizes in 30 years 25 years or less and the additional benefit is
projected to be fully funded in perpetuity."

Section 7. Section 19-9-109, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-9-109. Municipal police officers' retirement system benefit policy statement. It is the policy
of the state that additional benefits may not be added to the municipal police officers' retirement system unless
the system amortizes in 30 years 25 years or less and the additional benefit is projected to be fully funded in
perpetuity."
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 700

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 700.1

Section 8. Section 19-13-111, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-13-111. Firefighters' unified retirement system benefit policy statement. It is the policy of the
state that additional benefits may not be added to the firefighters' unified retirement system unless the system
amortizes in 30 years 25 years or less and the additional benefit is projected to be fully funded in perpetuity."

Section 9. Section 19-17-117, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-17-117. Volunteer Firefighters' Compensation Act benefit policy statement. It is the policy of
the state that additional benefits may not be added to the Volunteer Firefighters' Compensation Act unless the
system amortizes in 30 years 25 years or less and the additional benefit is projected to be fully funded in
perpetuity."

Section 10. Section 19-20-111, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-20-111. Teachers' retirement system benefit policy statement. It is the policy of the state that
additional benefits may not be added to the teachers' retirement system unless the system amortizes in 30
years 25 years or less and the additional benefit is projected to be fully funded in perpetuity."

NEW SECTION. Section 11. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 700